Wisconsin, session 2025, AB613.
do enact as follows:AB613,11Section 1. 118.164 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 118.164 (1) (intro.) and 2amended to read:AB613,2,33118.164 (1) (intro.) In this section, “teacher”: AB613,2,64(b) “Teacher” means a person holding a license or permit issued by the state 5superintendent whose employment by a school district requires that he or she hold 6that license or permit.AB613,27Section 2. 118.164 (1) (a) of the statutes is created to read:AB613,2,108118.164 (1) (a) “School principal” means a person holding a principal license 9issued by the state superintendent whose employment by a school district requires 10that he or she hold that license.AB613,311Section 3. 118.164 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB613,2,1912118.164 (4) The school principal or the school principal’s designee shall 13ensure the parent and guardian of each pupil in a class is notified any time a pupil 14is removed from the classroom and the quality or quantity of instructional time 15offered to the pupils in the class is diminished or reduced as a result of the removal. 16Notice is required under this paragraph if an entire class of pupils is removed from 17the classroom for purposes of a drill under s. 118.07 (2) or (4). The school principal 18or the school principal’s designee shall ensure that notice under this subsection 19satisfies all of the following criteria:AB613,2,2020(a) It is in writing.AB613,3,31(b) It is delivered electronically, unless the parent or guardian has refused to 2receive electronic communication from the school or school district, in which case it 3is delivered by 1st class mail.AB613,3,64(c) It is delivered as soon as is practicable following the removal from class, 5but for a notice that is delivered electronically by no later than 5 p.m. on the day of 6the removal.AB613,3,77(d) It does not include personally identifiable information.AB613,48Section 4. 118.164 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB613,3,129118.164 (5) (a) By October 1, 2027, and each October 1 thereafter, the 10principal of each school or the principal’s designee shall report to the school board 11the total number of removals from class that required a notification under sub. (4) 12in the previous school year.AB613,3,1613(b) By December 1, 2027, and each December 1 thereafter, each school board 14shall submit to the state superintendent a report that includes the information 15reported to the school board under par. (a) for each school under the school board’s 16charge.AB613,517Section 5. Effective date.AB613,3,1818(1) This act takes effect on July 1, 2026.AB613,3,1919